Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1030
Early voting materials; treatment.

All identification envelopes, voted ballots, and rejected ballots and the Rejected Ballots container shall be placed in the container for early voting materials, and the container shall be sealed.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 324;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 27.